Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202086-5,102
Act, how cited.

Sections 86-5,102 to 86-5,108 shall be known and may be cited as the Broadband Internet Service Infrastructure Act.

Laws 2020, LB992, § 1.